test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-barixa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - вариха: #

    бариха+V+FutPrc+Sg1: бариха
    бариха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: баринаб
    бариха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: баринаш
    бариха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: барина
    бариха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: баринабди
    бариха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: баринат
    бариха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: барина
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg1: барибаб
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg2: барибаш
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg3: бариба
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl1: барибабди
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl2: барибат
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl3: бариба
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg1: барилайб
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg2: барилайш
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg3: барилай
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl1: барилайбди
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl2: барилайт
    бариха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl3: барилай

    бариха+V+Imp+Sg2: бари
    бариха+V+Imp+Pl2: баригты
    бариха+V+Opt+Sg1: бариһууб
    бариха+V+Opt+Pl1: бариһуубди
    бариха+V+Vol+Sg1: барияа
    бариха+V+Vol+Pl1: [бария, бариябди]
    
    бариха+V+FutPrc+Sg1: барихаб
    бариха+V+FutPrc+Sg2: барихаш
    бариха+V+FutPrc+Sg3: бариха
    бариха+V+FutPrc+Pl1: барихабди
    бариха+V+FutPrc+Pl2: барихат
    бариха+V+FutPrc+Pl3: бариха
    бариха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg1: баряаб
    бариха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg2: баряаш
    бариха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg3: баряа
    бариха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl1: баряабди
    бариха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl2: баряат
    бариха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl3: баряа
    бариха+V+HabPrc+Sg1: баридагби
    бариха+V+HabPrc+Sg2: баридагши
    бариха+V+HabPrc+Sg3: баридаг
    бариха+V+HabPrc+Pl1: баридагбди
    бариха+V+HabPrc+Pl2: баридагта
    бариха+V+HabPrc+Pl3: баридаг
    бариха+V+AgPrc+Sg1: баригшаб
    бариха+V+AgPrc+Sg2: баригшаш
    бариха+V+AgPrc+Sg3: баригша
    бариха+V+AgPrc+Pl1: баригшабди
    бариха+V+AgPrc+Pl2: баригшат
    бариха+V+AgPrc+Pl3: баригша

    бариха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg1: баряашаб
    бариха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg2: баряашаш
    бариха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg3: баряаша
    бариха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl1: баряашабди
    бариха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl2: баряашат
    бариха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl3: баряаша

    бариха+V+PerfPrc+Sg1: бариһанби
    бариха+V+PerfPrc+Sg2: бариһанши
    бариха+V+PerfPrc+Sg3: бариһан
    бариха+V+PerfPrc+Pl1: [бариһанбди, бариһамди]
    бариха+V+PerfPrc+Pl2: бариһанта
    бариха+V+PerfPrc+Pl3: бариһан

    бариха+V+PotPrc+Sg1: барихаарби
    бариха+V+PotPrc+Sg2: барихаарши
    бариха+V+PotPrc+Sg3: барихаар
    бариха+V+PotPrc+Pl1: барихаарбди
    бариха+V+PotPrc+Pl2: барихаарта
    бариха+V+PotPrc+Pl3: барихаар

    бариха+V+DualPrc+Sg1: баримаарби
    бариха+V+DualPrc+Sg2: баримаарши
    бариха+V+DualPrc+Sg3: баримаар
    бариха+V+DualPrc+Pl1: баримаарбди
    бариха+V+DualPrc+Pl2: баримаарта
    бариха+V+DualPrc+Pl3: баримаар

    бариха+V+PassPrc+Sg1: баряатайб
    бариха+V+PassPrc+Sg2: баряатайш
    бариха+V+PassPrc+Sg3: баряатай
    бариха+V+PassPrc+Pl1: баряатайбди
    бариха+V+PassPrc+Pl2: баряатайт
    бариха+V+PassPrc+Pl3: баряатай

    бариха+V+ResPrc+Sg1: баринхайб
    бариха+V+ResPrc+Sg2: баринхайш
    бариха+V+ResPrc+Sg3: баринхай
    бариха+V+ResPrc+Pl1: баринхайбди
    бариха+V+ResPrc+Pl2: баринхайт
    бариха+V+ResPrc+Pl3: баринхай

    бариха+V+ConMod: барин
    бариха+V+ConImpf: барижа
    бариха+V+ConPrf: баряад
    бариха+V+ConCond: барибал
    бариха+V+ConConc: барибашье
    бариха+V+ConTerm: баритар
    бариха+V+ConCntmp: баримсаар
    бариха+V+ConAbtmp: бариһаар
    бариха+V+ConFin: барихаар
    бариха+V+ConIntnt: барихаяа
    бариха+V+ConSucc: барихалаар
    бариха+V+ConCmp: баринхаар
